Missouri, session 2026, SB1799.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 516.120, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 516.120,
to read as follows:
516.120. Within [five] two years:
(1) All actions upon contracts, obligations or
liabilities, express or implied, except those mentioned in
section 516.110, and except upon judgments or decrees of a
court of record, and except where a different time is herein
limited;
(2) An action upon a liability created by a statute
other than a penalty or forfeiture;
(3) An action for trespass on real estate;
(4) An action for taking, detaining or injuring any
goods or chattels, including actions for the recovery of
specific personal property, or for any other injury to the
person or rights of another, not arising on contract and not
herein otherwise enumerated;
(5) An action for relief on the ground of fraud, the
cause of action in such case to be deemed not to have
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1799 2
accrued until the discovery by the aggrieved party, at any
time within ten years, of the facts constituting the fraud.
✓